Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.50.205

AIDS information—Community and technical colleges.

The state board for community and technical colleges shall make information available to all newly matriculated students on methods of transmission of the human immunodeficiency virus and prevention of acquired immunodeficiency syndrome. The curricula and materials shall be reviewed for medical accuracy by the office on AIDS in coordination with the appropriate regional AIDS service network.

[ 1991 c 238 s 44; 1988 c 206 s 502.]